Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Prohibited Practices by Licensees.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 35, 36.

§ 4.1-324.
Illegal sale or keeping of alcoholic beverages by licensees; penalty.

No licensee or any agent or employee of such licensee shall:

Sell any alcoholic beverages of a kind other than that which such license or this subtitle authorizes him to sell;

Sell beer to which wine, spirits or alcohol has been added, except that a mixed beverage licensee may combine wine or spirits, or both, with beer pursuant to a patron’s order;

Sell wine to which spirits or alcohol, or both, have been added, otherwise than as required in the manufacture thereof under Board regulations, except that a mixed beverage licensee may (i) make sangria that contains brandy, triple sec, or other similar spirits and (ii) combine beer or spirits, or both, with wine pursuant to a patron’s order;

Sell alcoholic beverages of a kind which such license or this subtitle authorizes him to sell, but to any person other than to those to whom such license or this subtitle authorizes him to sell;

Sell alcoholic beverages which such license or this subtitle authorizes him to sell, but in any place or in any manner other than such license or this subtitle authorizes him to sell;

Sell any alcoholic beverages when forbidden by this subtitle;

Keep or allow to be kept, other than in his residence and for his personal use, any alcoholic beverages other than that which he is authorized to sell by such license or by this subtitle;

Sell any beer to a retail licensee, except for cash, if the seller holds a brewery, bottler’s or wholesale beer license;

Sell any beer on draft and fail to display to customers the brand of beer sold or misrepresent the brand of any beer sold;

Sell any wine for delivery within the Commonwealth to a retail licensee, except for cash, if the seller holds a wholesale wine or farm winery license;

Keep or allow to be kept or sell any vaporized form of an alcoholic beverage produced by an alcohol vaporizing device;

Keep any alcoholic beverage other than in the bottle or container in which it was purchased by him except: (i) for a frozen alcoholic beverage; and (ii) in the case of wine, in containers of a type approved by the Board pending automatic dispensing and sale of such wine; or

Establish any normal or customary pricing of its alcoholic beverages that is intended as a shift or device to evade any “happy hour” regulations adopted by the Board; however, a licensee may increase the volume of an alcoholic beverage sold to a customer if there is a commensurate increase in the normal or customary price charged for the same alcoholic beverage.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Neither this section nor any Board regulation shall prohibit an on-premises restaurant licensee from using alcoholic beverages that the licensee otherwise is authorized to purchase and possess for the purposes of preparing and selling for on-premises consumption food products with a final alcohol content of more than one-half of one percent by volume, as long as such food products are sold to and consumed by persons who are 21 years of age or older.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-60; 1970, c. 360; 1974, c. 460; 1984, c. 603; 1993, c. 866; 1998, c. 238; 2006, c. 714; 2008, cc. 513, 629, 875.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the introductory language, inserted “or any agent or employee of such licensee.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 714 added subdivision A 11.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 513 added the proviso at the end of subdivisions A 2 and A 3; added subdivisions A 12 and A 13 and subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment by c. 629 added subdivision A 12, made related changes; and added subsection C.

The 2008 amendment by c. 875 added the proviso at the end of subdivisions A 2 and A 3.

§ 4.1-325.
Prohibited acts by mixed beverage licensees; penalty.

In addition to §

4.1-324

, no mixed beverage licensee nor any agent or employee of such licensee shall:

Sell or serve any alcoholic beverage other than as authorized by law;

Sell any authorized alcoholic beverage to any person or at any place except as authorized by law;

Allow at the place described in his license the consumption of alcoholic beverages in violation of this subtitle;

Keep at the place described in his license any alcoholic beverage other than that which he is licensed to sell;

Misrepresent the brand of any alcoholic beverage sold or offered for sale;

Keep any alcoholic beverage other than in the bottle or container in which it was purchased by him except (i) for a frozen alcoholic beverage, which may include alcoholic beverages in a frozen drink dispenser of a type approved by the Board; (ii) in the case of wine, in containers of a type approved by the Board pending automatic dispensing and sale of such wine; and (iii) as otherwise provided by Board regulation. Neither this subdivision nor any Board regulation shall prohibit any mixed beverage licensee from premixing containers of sangria, to which spirits may be added, to be served and sold for consumption on the licensed premises;

Refill or partly refill any bottle or container of alcoholic beverage or dilute or otherwise tamper with the contents of any bottle or container of alcoholic beverage, except as provided by Board regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision B 11 of §

4.1-111

;

Sell or serve any brand of alcoholic beverage which is not the same as that ordered by the purchaser without first advising such purchaser of the difference;

Remove or obliterate any label, mark, or stamp affixed to any container of alcoholic beverages offered for sale;

Deliver or sell the contents of any container if the label, mark, or stamp has been removed or obliterated;

Allow any obscene conduct, language, literature, pictures, performance, or materials on the licensed premises;

Allow any striptease act on the licensed premises;

Allow persons connected with the licensed business to appear nude or partially nude;

Consume or allow the consumption by an employee of any alcoholic beverages while on duty and in a position that is involved in the selling or serving of alcoholic beverages to customers.

The provisions of this subdivision shall not prohibit any retail licensee or his designated employee from (i) consuming product samples or sample servings of (a) beer or wine provided by a representative of a licensed beer or wine wholesaler or manufacturer or (b) a distilled spirit provided by a permittee of the Board who represents a distiller, if such samples are provided in accordance with Board regulations and the retail licensee or his designated employee does not violate the provisions of subdivision 1 f of §

4.1-225

or (ii) tasting an alcoholic beverage that has been or will be delivered to a customer for quality control purposes;

Deliver to a consumer an original bottle of an alcoholic beverage purchased under such license whether the closure is broken or unbroken except in accordance with §

4.1-206.3

.

The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the delivery of:

“Soju.” For the purposes of this subdivision, “soju” means a traditional Korean alcoholic beverage distilled from rice, barley or sweet potatoes; or

Spirits, provided (i) the original container is no larger than 375 milliliters, (ii) the alcohol content is no greater than 15 percent by volume, and (iii) the contents of the container are carbonated and perishable;

Be intoxicated while on duty or employ an intoxicated person on the licensed premises;

Conceal any sale or consumption of any alcoholic beverages;

Fail or refuse to make samples of any alcoholic beverages available to the Board upon request or obstruct special agents of the Board in the discharge of their duties;

Store alcoholic beverages purchased under the license in any unauthorized place or remove any such alcoholic beverages from the premises;

Knowingly employ in the licensed business any person who has the general reputation as a prostitute, panderer, habitual law violator, person of ill repute, user or peddler of narcotics, or person who drinks to excess or engages in illegal gambling;

Keep on the licensed premises, except for the premises of a mixed beverage casino licensee, a slot machine or any prohibited gambling or gaming device, machine, or apparatus;

Make any gift of an alcoholic beverage, other than as a gift made (i) to a personal friend, as a matter of normal social intercourse, so long as the gift is in no way a shift or device to evade the restriction set forth in this subdivision; (ii) to a person responsible for the planning, preparation or conduct on any conference, convention, trade show or event held or to be held on the premises of the licensee, when such gift is made in the course of usual and customary business entertainment and is in no way a shift or device to evade the restriction set forth in this subdivision; (iii) pursuant to subsection B of §

4.1-209

; (iv) pursuant to subdivision A 10 of §

4.1-201

; (v) by a mixed beverage casino licensee to a patron of such licensee in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 15 of §

4.1-206.3

; or (vi) pursuant to any Board regulation. Any gift permitted by this subdivision shall be subject to the taxes imposed by this subtitle on sales of alcoholic beverages. The licensee shall keep complete and accurate records of gifts given in accordance with this subdivision; or

Establish any normal or customary pricing of its alcoholic beverages that is intended as a shift or device to evade any “happy hour” regulations adopted by the Board; however, a licensee may increase the volume of an alcoholic beverage sold to a customer if there is a commensurate increase in the normal or customary price charged for the same alcoholic beverage.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The provisions of subdivisions A 12 and A 13 shall not apply to persons operating theaters, concert halls, art centers, museums, or similar establishments that are devoted primarily to the arts or theatrical performances, when the performances that are presented are expressing matters of serious literary, artistic, scientific, or political value.

History.

1968, c. 7, § 4-98.10; 1970, c. 120; 1974, c. 548; 1975, c. 483; 1976, cc. 750, 768; 1978, c. 69; 1979, c. 227; 1982, c. 316; 1983, c. 608; 1993, c. 866; 2000, c. 780; 2002, c. 105; 2003, c. 856; 2004, c. 913; 2006, cc. 256, 826; 2008, cc. 513, 629, 794, 875; 2009, cc. 20, 509; 2010, c. 481; 2013, c. 661; 2015, cc. 38, 404, 604, 730; 2017, c. 154; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2022, cc. 589, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 780, in subsection A, deleted former subdivision 20, which read: “Allow any person to receive a percentage of the income of the licensed business or have any beneficial interest in such business, except in accordance with Board regulations,” and redesignated former subdivisions 21 and 22 as present subdivisions 20 and 21.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 105, in subdivision A 14, added “and in a position that is involved in the selling or serving of alcoholic beverages to customers” at the end of the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 856 added subdivision A 22, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 913 added the second paragraph of subdivision A 15.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 256 added clause (iii) in the first sentence in subdivision A 22, and made related changes.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826, in subdivision A 22, in the first sentence, substituted “(i) to” for “to (i)” and “(ii) to” for “or; (ii),” added clause (iv), and made a related change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 513, in subdivision A 6, inserted the clause designations, inserted “for a frozen alcoholic beverage, which may include alcoholic beverages” at the beginning of clause (i) and added the last sentence; added subdivision A 23; and made related changes.

The 2008 amendment by c. 629, in subdivision A 6, inserted the clause designations and inserted “for a frozen alcoholic beverage, which may include alcoholic beverages” at the beginning of clause (i).

The 2008 amendment by c. 794 deleted “immoral, lewd,” preceding “obscene” and “indecent or profane” thereafter in subdivision A 11; deleted “or the like” following “act” in subdivision A 12; and added subsection C.

The 2008 amendment by c. 875, in subdivision A 6, inserted the clause designations, inserted “for a frozen alcoholic beverage, which may include alcoholic beverages” at the beginning of clause (i) and added the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 20 and 509 are identical, and rewrote the second paragraph in subdivision A 15, inserting the A 15 a. designation and adding subdivision A 15 b.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 481 inserted clause A 6 (iii) and made a related change; and inserted “except as provided by Board regulation adopted pursuant to §

4.1-111

B 11” at the end of subdivision A 7.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 661 substituted “subdivision 1 f” for “subdivision 1 g” in clause (i) (b) of the second paragraph of subdivision A 14.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “subdivision B 11 of §

4.1-111

” for “§

4.1-111

B 11” in subdivision A 7 and substituted “subdivision” for “clause” in subdivision A 15 a.

The 2015 amendment by c. 404 substituted “from premixing containers of sangria, to which spirits may be added” for “from pre-mixing containers of sangria” in subdivision A 6 and substituted “(iv) pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

4.1-201

; or (v) pursuant to any Board regulation” for “or (iv) pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

4.1-201

” at the end of the first sentence of subdivision A 22.

The 2015 amendment by c. 604 substituted “A 11” for “A 12” following “subdivision” in subdivision A 22.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 154 substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C” in clause (iii) of subdivision A 22.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision A 15, substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

”; and in subdivision A 22 in the first sentence, substituted “subsection B” for “subsection D” in clause (iii) and “subdivision A 10” for “subdivision A 11” in clause (iv).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and inserted “except for the premises of a mixed beverage casino licensee” in subdivision A 21; in subdivision A 22, redesignated former clause (v) as clause (vi) and added clause (v); and made stylistic changes.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-325.01.
Combined licenses for same premises.

On and after July 1, 2015, any licensee of the Board that holds both a mixed beverage restaurant license and a mixed beverage caterer’s license for the same business premises may, upon request in writing to the Board, be granted a combined mixed beverage restaurant and caterer’s license for the same business premises. The Board may require such licensee to surrender the previously granted mixed beverage restaurant license and mixed beverage caterer’s license for the same licensed location. No additional license fee shall be assessed for this change.

History.

2015, c. 404.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 404, cl. 2 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 4.1-325.1.
Falsifying application; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any applicant for a banquet, special events, or mixed beverage special events license pursuant to §

4.1-206.3

to knowingly make a false statement in order to secure a license or to alter, change, borrow, or lend or attempt to use, borrow, or lend a license. Any person violating this provision shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

2002, c. 104; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in the first sentence, deleted “license pursuant to §

4.1-209

” preceding “or mixed beverage” and substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” and made stylistic changes.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-325.2.
Prohibited acts by employees of wine or beer licensees; penalty.

In addition to the provisions of §

4.1-324

, no retail wine or beer licensee or his agent or employee shall consume any alcoholic beverages while on duty and in a position that is involved in the selling or serving of alcoholic beverages to customers.The provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit any retail licensee or his designated employee from (i) consuming product samples or sample servings of beer or wine provided by a representative of a licensed beer or wine wholesaler or manufacturer, if such samples are provided in accordance with Board regulations and the retail licensee or his designated employee does not violate the provisions of subdivision 1 f of §

4.1-225

or (ii) tasting an alcoholic beverage that has been or will be delivered to a customer for quality control purposes.

For the purposes of subsection A, a wine or beer wholesaler or farm winery licensee or its employees that participate in a wine or beer tasting sponsored by a retail wine or beer licensee shall not be deemed to be agents of the retail wine or beer licensee.

No retail wine or beer licensee, or his agent or employee shall make any gift of an alcoholic beverage, other than as a gift made (i) to a personal friend, as a matter of normal social intercourse, so long as the gift is in no way a shift or device to evade the restriction set forth in this subsection; (ii) to a person responsible for the planning, preparation or conduct on any conference, convention, trade show or event held or to be held on the premises of the licensee, when such gift is made in the course of usual and customary business entertainment and is in no way a shift or device to evade the restriction set forth in this subsection; (iii) pursuant to subsection B of §

4.1-209

; (iv) pursuant to subdivision A 10 of §

4.1-201

; or (v) pursuant to any Board regulation. Any gift permitted by this subsection shall be subject to the taxes imposed by this subtitle on sales of alcoholic beverages. The licensee shall keep complete and accurate records of gifts given in accordance with this subsection.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $500.

History.

2002, c. 105; 2003, c. 856; 2006, cc. 256, 826; 2013, c. 661; 2015, cc. 404, 604; 2017, c. 154; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2002 act having been

4.1-325.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 856 inserted present subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 256 added clause (iii) in the first sentence in subsection C, and made related changes.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826, in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “(i) to” for “to (i)” and “(ii) to” for “or; (ii),” added clause (iv), and made a related change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 661 substituted “subdivision 1 f” for “subdivision 1 g” in clause (i) of the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 404 substituted “(iv) pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

4.1-201

; or (v) pursuant to any Board regulation” for “or (iv) pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

4.1-201

” at the end of the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2015 amendment by c. 604 substituted “A 11” for “A 12” following “subdivision” in subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 154 substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C” in clause (iii) of subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection C in the first sentence, substituted “subsection B” for “subsection D” in clause (iii) and “subdivision A 10” for “subdivision A 11” in clause (iv).

§ 4.1-326.
Sale of; purchase for resale; wine or beer from a person without a license; penalty.

No licensee, other than a common carrier operating in interstate or foreign commerce, licensed to sell wine or beer at retail shall purchase for resale or sell any wine or beer purchased from anyone other than a wholesale wine or wholesale beer licensee.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the holder of a retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

from the purchase or sale of wine or beer from the winery or brewery located on or contiguous to the licensed retail premises.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-64, 4-66; 1984, c. 200; 1988, c. 261; 1993, c. 866; 2015, c. 412.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 deleted “farm winery, brewery, bottler’s” preceding “or wholesale beer licensee” in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

§ 4.1-327.
Prohibiting transfer of wine or beer by licensees; penalty.

No retail licensee, except a retail on-premises wine and beer licensee, shall transfer any wine or beer from one licensed place of business to another licensed place of business whether such places of business are under the same ownership or not.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1954, c. 338, § 4-34.1; 1993, c. 866; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection A, deleted “or (ii) a retail on-premises beer licensee” preceding “shall transfer” and made a stylistic change.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-328.
Prohibited trade practices; penalty.

No person subject to the jurisdiction of the Board shall violate, attempt to violate, solicit another person to violate or consent to any violation of §

4.1-216

or

4.1-216.1

, or regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision B 3 of §

4.1-111

.

Any person found by the Board to have committed a violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty as provided in §

4.1-227

.

History.

1989, c. 528, § 4-79.1; 1992, c. 349; 1993, c. 866; 2007, c. 494.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 494, cl. 2, provides: “That the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall (i) include as part of its inspection of any retail licensee’s records a review of evidence of procurement, including payment, required by this act to be maintained by that retail licensee involving the procurement of alcoholic beverage advertising materials and (ii) report annually to the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services the following information: (a) the results of any audits of retail records involving the procurement, including purchases, of alcoholic beverage advertising materials authorized by this act and (b) the extent to which the Board has achieved compliance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 494 rewrote the section.

§ 4.1-329.
Illegal advertising materials; penalty.

No person subject to the jurisdiction of the Board shall induce, attempt to induce, or consent to, any manufacturer, as defined in §

4.1-216.1

, or any wholesale licensee selling, renting, lending, buying for or giving to any person any advertising materials or decorations under circumstances prohibited by this subtitle or Board regulations.

Any person found by the Board to have violated this section shall be subject to a civil penalty as provided in §

4.1-227

.

History.

1981, c. 574, § 4-69.2; 1993, c. 866; 2007, c. 494.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 494, cl. 2 provides: “That the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall (i) include as part of its inspection of any retail licensee’s records a review of evidence of procurement, including payment, required by this act to be maintained by that retail licensee involving the procurement of alcoholic beverage advertising materials and (ii) report annually to the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services the following information: (a) the results of any audits of retail records involving the procurement, including purchases, of alcoholic beverage advertising materials authorized by this act and (b) the extent to which the Board has achieved compliance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 494 rewrote the section.

§ 4.1-330.
Solicitation by persons interested in manufacture, etc., of alcoholic beverages; penalty.

No person having any interest, direct or indirect, in the manufacture, distribution, or sale of spirits or other alcoholic beverages shall, without a permit granted by the Board and upon such conditions as the Board may prescribe, solicit either directly or indirectly (i) a mixed beverage licensee; (ii) any agent, servant, or employee of such licensee; or (iii) any person connected with the licensee in any capacity whatsoever in his licensed business, to sell or offer for sale the particular spirits or other alcoholic beverage in which such person may be so interested.The Board, upon proof of any solicitation in violation of this subsection, may suspend or terminate the sale through government stores or its purchase of the brand of spirits or other alcoholic beverage which was the subject matter of the unlawful solicitation or promotion. In addition, the Board may suspend or terminate the sale through such stores or its purchase of all brands of spirits or other alcoholic beverages manufactured or distributed by either the employer or principal of such solicitor, the broker, or by the owner of the brand of spirits unlawfully solicited or promoted. The Board may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $250,000 in lieu of such suspension or termination of sales through government stores or purchases by the Board or portion thereof, or both.Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

No mixed beverage licensee or any agent, servant, or employee of such licensee, or any person connected with the licensee in any capacity whatsoever in his licensed business shall, either directly or indirectly, be a party to, consent to, solicit, or aid or abet another in a violation of subsection A.The Board may suspend or revoke the license granted to such licensee, or may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 in lieu of such suspension or any portion thereof, or both.Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1968, c. 7, § 4-98.16; 1988, c. 786; 1990, c. 442; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-331.
Failure to pay tax or to deliver, keep and preserve records and accounts, or to allow examination and inspection; penalty.

No licensee shall fail or refuse to (i) pay any tax provided for in §

4.1-234

or §

4.1-236

; (ii) deliver, keep and preserve such records, invoices and accounts as are required by §

4.1-204

or Board regulation; or (iii) allow such records, invoices and accounts or his place of business to be examined and inspected in accordance with §

4.1-204

.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-65; 1988, c. 261, § 4-136; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-332.
Nonpayment of excise tax on beer, wine coolers, and wine; additional penalties.

No person shall sell (i) beer or wine coolers to retailers or consumers without paying the excise tax imposed by §

4.1-236

or (ii) wine to retailers or consumers without paying the excise tax imposed by subsection A of §

4.1-234

. No retailer shall purchase, receive, transport, store or sell any beer, wine coolers, or wine on which such retailer has reason to know such tax has not been paid and may not be paid.Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

In addition to subsection A, on each manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler who fails to make any return and pay the full amount of the tax required by §

4.1-236

or subsection A of §

4.1-234

, as applicable, there shall be imposed a civil penalty to be added to the tax in the amount of five percent of the proper tax due if the failure is for not more than thirty days, with an additional five percent for each additional thirty days, or fraction thereof, during which the failure continues. Such civil penalty shall not exceed twenty-five percent in the aggregate. In the case of a false or fraudulent return, where willful intent exists to defraud the Commonwealth of any excise tax due on beer, wine coolers, or wine, a civil penalty of fifty percent of the amount of the proper tax due shall be assessed. All penalties and interest shall be payable to the Board and if not so paid shall be collectible in the same manner as if they were a part of the tax imposed.

After reasonable notice to the manufacturer, bottler, wholesaler or retailer, the Board may suspend or revoke the license of the manufacturer, bottler, wholesaler or retailer who has failed to make any return or to pay the full amount of the excise tax.

History.

1988, c. 261, §§ 4-139, 4-140; 1993, c. 866; 2018, cc. 405, 406.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 405 and 406 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “(i)” and added clause (ii) in the first sentence and inserted “or wine” in the second sentence; and in subsection B, inserted “or subsection A of §

4.1-234

, as applicable” in the first sentence and inserted “or wine” in the third sentence; and made stylistic changes.